Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.035

Process for review.

The building code council shall:

(1)(a) By July 1, 2019, adopt a revised process for the review of proposed statewide amendments to the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031; and

(b) Adopt a process for the review of proposed or enacted local amendments to the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building code council.

(2) By December 31, 2019, adopt building code standards specific for tiny houses.

[ 2019 c 352 s 6; 2018 c 207 s 2; 1989 c 266 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—2019 c 352: See note following RCW 58.17.040.

Effective date—2018 c 207 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 19.27.070.